Massachusetts, session 194th, S2341.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 161C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 8. (a) No train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight
may be operated unless it has a crew consisting of at least 2 persons. For the purposes of this
section, “train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight” shall not include
hostler service or utility employees.
(b) A company who willfully violates this section may be subject to a fine of: (i) not less
than $250 nor more than $1,000, for a first offense; (ii) not less than $1,000 nor more than
$5,000, for a second offense committed within 3 years; and (iii) not less than $5,000 nor more
than $10,000, for a third offense and subsequent offenses committed within 3 years.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025.
of 2